Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-513
Legal services; payment authorized.

The school board or board of education of any school district in this state may pay from its school funds for the legal services of an attorney employed by the board when it deems legal counsel necessary or advisable.

Laws 1957, c. 345, § 2, p. 1188;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,150;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 266.